Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.120

Firearms as loan security.

No person other than a duly licensed dealer shall make any loan secured by a mortgage, deposit or pledge of a pistol. Any licensed dealer receiving a pistol as a deposit or pledge for a loan shall keep such records and make such reports as are provided by law for pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers in cities of the first class. A duly licensed dealer may mortgage any pistol or stock of pistols but shall not deposit or pledge the same with any other person.

[ 1961 c 124 s 9; 1935 c 172 s 12; RRS s 2516-12.]

NOTES:

Pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers: Chapter 19.60 RCW.